Missouri, session 2026, SB1551.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1
Section A. Chapter 94, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
2
one new section, to be known as section 94.833, to read as
3
follows:
1
94.833. 1. As used in this section, the following
2
terms mean:
3
(1) "City", a city of the third classification that
4
operates under the city manager form of government
5
established under chapter 78;
6
(2) "Lodging establishment", a hotel, motel, bed and
7
breakfas t inn, or other similar establishment offering
8
similar lodging accommodations;
9
(3) "Lodging facility", a short-term rental of a
10
house, c o ndominium, campground cabin, or other similar
11
facility offering similar lodging accommodations;
12
(4) "Transient guests", individuals who, for thirty-
13
one days or less during any calendar quarter, occupy a room
14
or rooms in a lodging establishment or occupy a lodging
15
facility.
16
2. (1) The governing body of a city may impose a tax
17
on the c harg e s for all lodging establishment sleeping rooms

SB 1551 2
18
paid by the transient guests of lodging establishments and
19
on the charges for all lodging facilities paid by transient
20
guests who occupy such lodging facilities that are situated
21
in the city or a portion thereof.
22
(2) Such tax shall:
23
(a) Not exceed five percent per occupied lodging
24
establis h ment sleeping room per night or five percent per
25
rental term of such lodging facility;
26
(b) Be in addition to the charge for the lodging
27
establis h ment sleeping room or lodging facility and shall be
28
in addition to any and all other taxes; and
29
(c) Be stated separately from all other charges and
30
taxes.
31
(3) The proceeds of such tax shall be used by the city
32
for the p romotion of tourism.
33
(4) Such tax shall not become effective unless the
34
governin g body of the county submits to the voters of the
35
city, at any election available for the city, a proposal to
36
authorize the governing body of the city to impose the tax
37
under this section.
38
3. (1) The question submitted for the tax authorized
39
in this sect i on shall be in substantially the following form:
40
"Shall ______ (insert city name) impose a tax
41
on the charges for all sleeping rooms and on
42
the charges for all short-term rentals paid by
43
the transient guests of lodging establishments
44
and lodging facilities situated in ______
45
(insert city name) at a rate of ______ (insert
46
percentage) percent, the proceeds of which
47
shall be used solely for the promotion of
48
tourism?".

SB 1551 3
49
(2) If a majority of the votes cast on the question by
50
the qual i fied voters voting thereon are in favor of the
51
question, the tax shall become effective on the first day of
52
the second calendar quarter following the calendar quarter
53
in which the election was held. If a majority of the votes
54
cast on the question by the qua l ified voters voting thereon
55
are opposed to the question, the tax shall not become
56
effective unless and until the question is resubmitted under
57
this section to the qualified voters and such question is
58
approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the
59
question.
60
4. (1) On and after the effective date of any tax
61
authori z ed i n this section, the city may adopt one of the
62
two following provisions for the collection and
63
administration of the tax:
64
(a) The city may adopt rules and regulations for the
65
internal collection of such tax by the city officers usually
66
responsible for collection and administration of city taxes;
67
or
68
(b) The city may enter into an agreement with the
69
director of revenue of the state of Missouri for the purpose
70
of collecting the tax authorized in this section.
71
(2) If a city adopts the internal collection of such
72
tax unde r paragraph (a) of subdivision (1) of this
73
subsection, the city:
74
(a) Shall establish a fund for the deposit of all
75
revenues derived from such tax, from which the city may
76
disburse moneys for the sole purpose of the promotion of
77
tourism through marketing, events, and constructing and
78
maintaining tourism facilities; and
79
(b) May collect a penalty of one percent and interest
80
not to e x ceed two percent per month on unpaid taxes that are

SB 1551 4
81
deemed delinquent thirty days after the last day of each
82
quarter.
83
(3) If such city enters into an agreement under
84
paragrap h (b) of subdivision (1) of this subsection, the
85
director of revenue shall:
86
(a) Perform all functions incident to the
87
administ r ation, collection, enforcement, and operation of
88
such tax;
89
(b) Promulgate rules and regulations prescribing the
90
forms an d procedures under which the tax authorized in this
91
section shall be collected and reported;
92
(c) Collect the tax authorized in this section; and
93
(d) Retain an amount not to exceed one percent for
94
cost of c ollection.
95
5. (1) After the initial bonds, if any, have been
96
satisfi e d, t h e governing body of such city may submit to the
97
voters of the city, at any election available for the city,
98
a proposal to repeal the tax imposed under this section.
99
(2) The question submitted for such repeal shall be in
100
substant i ally the following form:
101
"Shall ______ (insert city name) repeal the tax
102
imposed on the charges for all sleeping rooms and
103
on the charges for all short-term rentals paid by
104
the transient guests of lodging establishments
105
and lodging facilities situated in ______ (insert
106
city name) at a rate of ______ (insert
107
percentage) percent for the promotion of
108
tourism?".
109
(3) If a majority of the votes cast on the question by
110
the qual i fied voters voting thereon are in favor of the
111
question, the repeal shall become effective on December
112
thirty-first of the calendar year in which such appeal was

SB 1551 5
113
approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the question
114
by the qua lified voters voting thereon are opposed to the
115
question, the repeal shall not become effective unless and
116
until the question is resubmitted under this subsection to
117
the qualified voters and such question is approved by a
118
majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
